Maine, session 132, LD1504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-CCC is enacted to read:
§5219-CCC. Credit card and debit card transaction fee tax credit
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Card issuer" means a person that issues a credit card or debit card or the agent of
such a person with respect to such a card.
B. "Credit card" has the same meaning as in Title 9-A, section 1-301, subsection 16.
C. "Debit card" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section 1271, subsection 3.
D. "Eligible business" means a business located in this State that has gross sales of
less than $2,400,000 annually.
E. "Fee" means the transaction fee imposed by a card issuer on a business for the use
of that card issuer's credit card or debit card.
2. Tax credit allowed. An eligible business that accepts credit cards or debit cards as
payment for goods or services sold by that business is allowed a credit against the tax
imposed by this Part to offset the fee imposed by the card issuer on the business. The
amount of the tax credit may not exceed the lesser of the actual fees paid by the business
and 2.5% of the sales tax remitted to the State by the business pursuant to chapter 219.
3. Credit refundable. The tax credit allowed under this section is refundable.
4. Record keeping. A business claiming a credit pursuant to subsection 2 is
responsible for maintaining records of the fee paid by the business and the total sales made
by that business annually.
5. Rules. The assessor may adopt routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A to implement the provisions of this section.